Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There is appropriated to the State Library, for the biennium  beginning July
1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $5,421,047.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $357,155
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts other
than those described in section 3 of this 2025 Act, but excluding lottery funds and federal
funds, collected or received by the State Library.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$9,458,429 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from moneys received from the assessment against state  agencies de-
scribed in ORS 357.203 and transferred to the Miscellaneous Receipts Account for  the State
Library.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$5,738,385 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the State Library.
SECTION 5. This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled House Bill 5017 (HB 5017-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 2, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 12, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5017 (HB 5017-A) Page 2